Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Chapter 62. Mississippi Advantage Jobs Act

§ 57-62-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Mississippi Advantage Jobs Act.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 24, eff from and after passage (approved Aug. 30, 2000.).

§ 57-62-3.
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature that:

The State of Mississippi provide appropriate incentives to support the establishment of quality business and industry that hold the promise of significant development of the economy of the State of Mississippi through the creation of quality jobs;

The amount of incentives provided under this chapter in connection with a particular establishment shall be directly related to the jobs created as a result of the establishment locating in the State of Mississippi;

The Mississippi Development Authority and the Department of Revenue shall implement the provisions of this chapter and exercise all powers as authorized in this chapter; however, the application of this chapter or the offering of any of its incentives as to any particular qualified business or industry shall be in the sole discretion of the Mississippi Development Authority. The exercise of powers conferred by this chapter shall be deemed and held to be the performance of essential public purposes; and

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to constitute a guarantee or assumption by the State of Mississippi of any debt of any individual, company, corporation or association nor to authorize the credit of the State of Mississippi to be given, pledged or loaned to any individual, company, corporation or association. Also, nothing in this chapter gives any right to any qualified business or industry to the incentives contained herein unless said incentive is given by the Mississippi Development Authority pursuant to this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 25; Laws, 2010, ch. 533, § 31, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 16, 2010.).

§ 57-62-5.
Definitions [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

[For businesses or industries that apply for incentive payments from and after July 1, 2010, this section shall read as follows:]

As used in this chapter, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Qualified business or industry” means any corporation, limited liability company, partnership, sole proprietorship, business trust or other legal entity and subunits or affiliates thereof, pursuant to rules and regulations of the MDA, which:

Is a data/information processing enterprise meeting minimum criteria established by the MDA that provides an average annual salary, excluding benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income taxes, of at least one hundred percent (100%) of the most recently published state average annual wage or the most recently published average annual wage of the county in which the qualified business or industry is located as determined by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, whichever is the lesser, and creates not less than two hundred (200) new direct jobs if the enterprise is located in a Tier One or Tier Two area (as such areas are designated in accordance with Section 57-73-21), or which creates not less than one hundred (100) new jobs if the enterprise is located in a Tier Three area (as such areas are designated in accordance with Section 57-73-21);

Is a manufacturing or distribution enterprise meeting minimum criteria established by the MDA that provides an average annual salary, excluding benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income taxes, of at least one hundred ten percent (110%) of the most recently published state average annual wage or the most recently published average annual wage of the county in which the qualified business or industry is located as determined by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, whichever is the lesser, invests not less than Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00) in land, buildings and equipment, and creates not less than fifty (50) new direct jobs if the enterprise is located in a Tier One or Tier Two area (as such areas are designated in accordance with Section 57-73-21), or which creates not less than twenty (20) new jobs if the enterprise is located in a Tier Three area (as such areas are designated in accordance with Section 57-73-21);

Is a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, sole proprietorship, business trust or other legal entity and subunits or affiliates thereof, pursuant to rules and regulations of the MDA, which provides an average annual salary, excluding benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income taxes, of at least one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the most recently published state average annual wage or the most recently published average annual wage of the county in which the qualified business or industry is located as determined by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, whichever is the lesser, and creates not less than twenty-five (25) new direct jobs if the enterprise is located in a Tier One or Tier Two area (as such areas are designated in accordance with Section 57-73-21), or which creates not less than ten (10) new jobs if the enterprise is located in a Tier Three area (as such areas are designated in accordance with Section 57-73-21). An establishment shall not be considered to be a qualified business or industry unless it offers, or will offer within one hundred eighty (180) days of the date it receives the first incentive payment pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, a basic health benefits plan to the individuals it employs in new direct jobs in this state which is approved by the MDA. Qualified business or industry does not include retail business or gaming business; or

Is a research and development or a technology intensive enterprise meeting minimum criteria established by the MDA that provides an average annual salary, excluding benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income taxes, of at least one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the most recently published state average annual wage or the most recently published average annual wage of the county in which the qualified business or industry is located as determined by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, whichever is the lesser, and creates not less than ten (10) new direct jobs.

An establishment shall not be considered to be a qualified business or industry unless it offers, or will offer within one hundred eighty (180) days of the date it receives the first incentive payment pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, a basic health benefits plan to the individuals it employs in new direct jobs in this state which is approved by the MDA. Qualified business or industry does not include retail business or gaming business.

“New direct job” means full-time employment in this state in a qualified business or industry that has qualified to receive an incentive payment pursuant to this chapter, which employment did not exist in this state before the date of approval by the MDA of the application of the qualified business or industry pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. “New direct job” shall include full-time employment in this state of employees who are employed by an entity other than the establishment that has qualified to receive an incentive payment and who are leased to the qualified business or industry, if such employment did not exist in this state before the date of approval by the MDA of the application of the establishment.

“Full-time job” or “full-time employment” means a job of at least thirty-five (35) hours per week.

“Estimated direct state benefits” means the tax revenues projected by the MDA to accrue to the state as a result of the qualified business or industry.

“Estimated direct state costs” means the costs projected by the MDA to accrue to the state as a result of the qualified business or industry.

“Estimated net direct state benefits” means the estimated direct state benefits less the estimated direct state costs.

“Net benefit rate” means the estimated net direct state benefits computed as a percentage of gross payroll, provided that:

Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph (g), the net benefit rate may be variable and shall not exceed four percent (4%) of the gross payroll; and shall be set in the sole discretion of the MDA;

In no event shall incentive payments, cumulatively, exceed the estimated net direct state benefits.

“Gross payroll” means wages for new direct jobs of the qualified business or industry.

“MDA” means the Mississippi Development Authority.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 26; Laws, 2003, ch. 422, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 52; Laws, 2005, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 69; Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 52; Laws, 2010, ch. 533, § 32; Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 52; Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 53; Laws, 2011, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 52, eff from and after July 1, 2012; reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 52, eff from and after April 3, 2019.

§ 57-62-7.
Mississippi Development Authority to determine if establishment engaged in qualified business or industry.

The MDA shall determine, upon initial application on a form approved by the MDA, if an establishment is engaged in a qualified business or industry.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 27, eff from and after passage (approved Aug. 30, 2000.).

§ 57-62-9.
Incentive payments; qualifications; extension of time for receipt of incentive payments and waiver of job maintenance and creation requirements under certain circumstances [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

[For businesses or industries that received or applied for incentive payments prior to July 1, 2005, this section shall read as follows:]

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a qualified business or industry that meets the qualifications specified in this chapter may receive quarterly incentive payments for a period not to exceed ten (10) years from the Department of Revenue pursuant to the provisions of this chapter in an amount which shall be equal to the net benefit rate multiplied by the actual gross payroll of new direct jobs for a calendar quarter as verified by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, but not to exceed:

Ninety percent (90%) of the amount of money previously paid into the fund by the employer if the employer provides an average annual salary, excluding benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income taxes, of at least one hundred seventy-five percent (175%) of the most recently published state average annual wage or the most recently published average annual wage of the county in which the qualified business or industry is located as determined by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, whichever is the lesser;

Eighty percent (80%) of the amount of money previously paid into the fund by the employer if the employer provides an average annual salary, excluding benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income taxes, of at least one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) but less than one hundred seventy-five percent (175%) of the most recently published state average annual wage or the most recently published average annual wage of the county in which the qualified business or industry is located as determined by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, whichever is the lesser; or

Seventy percent (70%) of the amount of money previously paid into the fund by the employer if the employer provides an average annual salary, excluding benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income taxes, of less than one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the most recently published state average annual wage or the most recently published average annual wage of the county in which the qualified business or industry is located as determined by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, whichever is the lesser.

A qualified business or industry that is a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1 may elect the date upon which the ten-year period will begin. Such date may not be later than sixty (60) months after the date the business or industry applied for incentive payments.

A qualified business or industry that is a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1 may apply to the MDA to receive incentive payments for an additional period not to exceed five (5) years beyond the expiration date of the initial ten-year period if:

The qualified business or industry creates at least three thousand (3,000) new direct jobs within five (5) years after the date the business or industry commences commercial production;

Within five (5) years after the date the business or industry commences commercial production, the average annual wage of the jobs is at least one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the most recently published state average annual wage or the most recently published average annual wage of the county in which the qualified business or industry is located as determined by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, whichever is the lesser. The criteria for the average annual wage requirement shall be based upon the state average annual wage or the average annual wage of the county whichever is appropriate, at the time of creation of the minimum number of jobs, and the threshold established at that time will remain constant for the duration of the additional period; and

The qualified business or industry meets and maintains the job and wage requirements of subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of this paragraph (a) for four (4) consecutive calendar quarters.

A qualified business or industry that is a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1 and qualified to receive incentive payments for the additional period provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) may apply to the MDA to receive incentive payments for an additional period not to exceed ten (10) years beyond the expiration date of the additional period provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) if:

The qualified business or industry creates at least four thousand (4,000) new direct jobs after qualifying for the additional incentive period provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) but before the expiration of the additional period. For purposes of determining whether the business or industry meets the minimum jobs requirement of this subparagraph (i), the number of jobs the business or industry created in order to meet the minimum jobs requirement of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall be subtracted from the minimum jobs requirement of this subparagraph (i);

The average annual wage of the jobs is at least one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the most recently published state average annual wage or the most recently published average annual wage of the county in which the qualified business or industry is located as determined by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, whichever is the lesser. The criteria for the average annual wage requirement shall be based upon the state average annual wage or the average annual wage of the county whichever is appropriate, at the time of creation of the minimum number of jobs, and the threshold established at that time will remain constant for the duration of the additional period; and

The qualified business or industry meets and maintains the job and wage requirements of subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of this paragraph (b) for four (4) consecutive calendar quarters.

In order to receive incentive payments, an establishment shall apply to the MDA. The application shall be on a form prescribed by the MDA and shall contain such information as may be required by the MDA to determine if the applicant is qualified.

In order to qualify to receive such payments, the establishment applying shall be required to meet the definition of the term “qualified business or industry”;

The criteria for the average annual salary requirement shall be based upon the state average annual wage or the average annual wage of the county whichever is appropriate, at the time of application, and the threshold established upon application will remain constant for the duration of the project;

The business or industry must meet its job creation commitment within twenty-four (24) months of the application approval. However, if the qualified business or industry is applying for incentive payments for an additional period under subsection (2) of this section, the business or industry must comply with the applicable job and wage requirements of subsection (2) of this section.

The MDA shall determine if the applicant is qualified to receive incentive payments.

If the applicant is determined to be qualified to receive incentive payments for an additional period under subsection (2) of this section, the MDA shall conduct a cost/benefit analysis to determine the estimated net direct state benefits and the net benefit rate applicable for the appropriate additional period and to estimate the amount of gross payroll for the additional period. In conducting such cost/benefit analysis, the MDA shall consider quantitative factors, such as the anticipated level of new tax revenues to the state along with the cost to the state of the qualified business or industry, and such other criteria as deemed appropriate by the MDA, including the adequacy of retirement benefits that the business or industry provides to individuals it employs in new direct jobs in this state. In no event shall incentive payments, cumulatively, exceed the estimated net direct state benefits. Once the qualified business or industry is approved by the MDA, an agreement shall be deemed to exist between the qualified business or industry and the State of Mississippi, requiring the continued incentive payment to be made as long as the qualified business or industry retains its eligibility.

Upon approval of such an application, the MDA shall notify the Department of Revenue and shall provide it with a copy of the approved application and the estimated net direct state benefits. The Department of Revenue may require the qualified business or industry to submit such additional information as may be necessary to administer the provisions of this chapter. The qualified business or industry shall report to the Department of Revenue periodically to show its continued eligibility for incentive payments. The qualified business or industry may be audited by the Department of Revenue to verify such eligibility. In addition, the State Auditor may conduct performance and compliance audits under this chapter according to Section 7-7-211(o) and may bill the oversight agency.

If the qualified business or industry is located in an area that has been declared by the Governor to be a disaster area and as a result of the disaster the business or industry is unable to create or maintain the full-time jobs required by this section:

The Commissioner of Revenue may extend the period of time that the business or industry may receive incentive payments for a period of time not to exceed two (2) years;

The Commissioner of Revenue may waive the requirement that a certain number of jobs be maintained for a period of time not to exceed twenty-four (24) months; and

The MDA may extend the period of time within which the jobs must be created for a period of time not to exceed twenty-four (24) months.

HISTORY:
Laws of 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 28; Laws, 2000, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 16; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 53; Laws, 2005, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 70; Laws, 2007, ch. 475, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 53; Laws, 2010, ch. 533, § 33; Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 53; Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 54; Laws, 2011 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 53; Laws, 2014, ch. 427, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2014; reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 53, eff from and after April 3, 2019.

§ 57-62-11.
Mississippi Advantage Jobs Incentive Payment Fund; creation; purpose; administration.

There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the Mississippi Advantage Jobs Incentive Payment Fund, into which shall be deposited withholding tax revenue required to be deposited into such fund pursuant to Section 27-7-312. The money in the fund shall be used for the purpose of making the incentive payments authorized under this chapter.

The Mississippi Advantage Jobs Incentive Payment Fund shall be administered by the Department of Revenue, and monies in the fund, less three percent (3%) to be retained by the Department of Revenue to pay the reasonable and necessary expenses of the Department of Revenue in administering its duties under this chapter, shall be expended pursuant to the approved application. Amounts in the fund at the end of any fiscal year that are not necessary to make future incentive payments shall be paid into the General Fund.

The liability of the State of Mississippi to make the incentive payments authorized under this chapter shall be limited to the balance contained in the fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 29; Laws, 2010, ch. 533, § 34, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 16, 2010.).

§ 57-62-13.
Qualified business or industry to file claim for incentive payment; qualifications and requirements for receiving incentive payments.

As soon as practicable after the end of a calendar quarter for which a qualified business or industry has qualified to receive an incentive payment, the qualified business or industry shall file a claim for the payment with the Department of Revenue and shall specify the actual number of new direct jobs created and maintained by the business or industry for the calendar quarter and the gross payroll thereof. The Department of Revenue shall verify the actual number of new direct jobs created and maintained by the business or industry and compliance with the average annual wage requirements for such business or industry under this chapter. If the qualified business or industry files a claim for an incentive payment during an additional incentive period provided under Section 57-62-9(2), the Department of Revenue shall verify the actual number of new direct jobs created and maintained by the business or industry and compliance with the average annual wage requirements for such business or industry under this chapter. If the Department of Revenue is not able to provide such verification utilizing all available resources, the Department of Revenue may request such additional information from the business or industry as may be necessary.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the business or industry must meet the salary and job requirements of this chapter for four (4) consecutive calendar quarters prior to payment of the first incentive payment. Except as otherwise provided in Section 57-62-9, if the business or industry does not maintain the salary or job requirements of this chapter at any other time during the ten-year period after the date the first payment was made, the incentive payments shall not be made and shall not be resumed until such time as the actual verified number of new direct jobs created and maintained by the business or industry equals or exceeds the requirements of this chapter for one (1) calendar quarter.

If the business or industry is qualified to receive incentive payments for an additional period provided under Section 57-62-9(2), the business or industry must meet the wage and job requirements of Section 57-62-9(2), for four (4) consecutive calendar quarters prior to payment of the first incentive payment. If the business or industry does not maintain the wage or job requirements of Section 57-62-9(2), at any other time during the appropriate additional period after the date the first payment was made, the incentive payments shall not be made and shall not be resumed until such time as the actual verified number of new direct jobs created and maintained by the business or industry equals or exceeds the amounts specified in Section 57-62-9(2), for one (1) calendar quarter.

An establishment that has qualified pursuant to this chapter may receive payments only in accordance with the provision under which it initially applied and was approved. If an establishment that is receiving incentive payments expands, it may apply for additional incentive payments based on the new gross payroll for new direct jobs anticipated from the expansion only, pursuant to this chapter.

As soon as practicable after verification of the qualified business or industry meeting the requirements of this chapter and all rules and regulations, the Department of Finance and Administration, upon requisition of the Department of Revenue, shall issue a warrant drawn on the Mississippi Advantage Jobs Incentive Payment Fund to the establishment in the amount of the incentive payment as determined pursuant to subsection (1) of this section for the calendar quarter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 30; Laws, 2000, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 17; Laws, 2005, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 71; Laws, 2007, ch. 475, § 2; Laws, 2010, ch. 533, § 35; Laws, 2011 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved September 7, 2011.).

§ 57-62-15.
Promulgation of rules and regulations.

The MDA and the Department of Revenue shall promulgate rules and regulations, in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law, and all application forms and other forms necessary to implement their respective duties and responsibilities under the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 31; Laws, 2010, ch. 533, § 36, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 16, 2010.).

§ 57-62-17.
Annual report.

The MDA shall prepare a report on the program pursuant to Section 57-1-12.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 32, eff from and after passage (approved Aug. 30, 2000.).